Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
658B]

UNIFORM
FOREIGN-MONEY CLAIMS ACT

Section

658B-1 Definitions

658B-2 Scope

658B-3 Variation by agreement

658B-4 Determining the money of the claim

658B-5 Determining the amount of the money of
certain

contract claims

658B-6 Asserting and defending a foreign-money
claim

658B-7 Judgments and awards on foreign-money
claims; times of

money conversion; form of judgment

658B-8 Conversions of foreign money in a
distribution

proceeding

658B-9 Prejudgment and judgment interest

658B-10 Enforcement of foreign judgments

658B-11 Temporarily determining the United States
dollar value

of foreign-money claims for limited
purposes

658B-12 Effect of currency revalorizations

658B-13 Supplementary general principles of law

658B-14 Short title

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next